Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 8
G

EORGIA AGRICULTURAL EXPOSITION AUTHORITY

12-3-470 through 12-3-484. Reserved.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2011, p. 261,

§

4/HB 125, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Sections 12-3-470 through 12-3-484 as present Code Sections 2-3-1 through 2-3-15 and reserved the former Code section designations.